Washington statutes.
RCW 19.260.030

Application of chapter.

(1) This chapter applies to the following types of new products sold, offered for sale, or installed in the state:

(a) Hot water dispensers and mini-tank electric water heaters;

(b) Bottle-type water dispensers and point-of-use water dispensers;

(c) Portable electric spas;

(d) Tub spout diverters;

(e) Commercial hot food holding cabinets;

(f) Air compressors;

(g) Commercial fryers, commercial dishwashers, and commercial steam cookers;

(h) Computers and computer monitors;

(i) Faucets;

(j) High CRI fluorescent lamps;

(k) Portable air conditioners;

(l) Residential ventilating fans;

(m) Showerheads;

(n) Spray sprinkler bodies;

(o) Urinals and water closets;

(p) Water coolers;

(q) General service lamps;

(r) Electric storage water heaters;

(s) Air purifiers other than industrial air purifiers;

(t) Commercial ovens; and

(u) Electric vehicle supply equipment.

(2) This chapter applies equally to products whether they are sold, offered for sale, or installed as stand-alone products or as components of other products.

(3) This chapter does not apply to:

(a) New products manufactured in the state and sold outside the state;

(b) New products manufactured outside the state and sold at wholesale inside the state for final retail sale and installation outside the state;

(c) Products installed in mobile manufactured homes at the time of construction; or

(d) Products designed expressly for installation and use in recreational vehicles.

[ 2022 c 19 s 3; 2019 c 286 s 3; 2009 c 501 s 2; 2006 c 194 s 2; 2005 c 298 s 3.]